Utah statutes.
72-11-204.    Vacancies -- Expenses -- Reimbursement -- Use of facilities of
Department of Transportation -- Functions, powers, duties, rights, and
responsibilities.
(1)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term.
(2)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(3)  Reimbursement shall be made from fees collected by the committee for
services rendered by it.
(4)  The Department of Transportation shall supply the committee with office
accommodation, space, equipment, and secretarial assistance the executive
director considers adequate for the committee.
(5)  In addition to the functions, powers, duties, rights, and
responsibilities granted to it under this chapter, the committee shall assume
and have all of the functions, powers, duties, rights, and responsibilities of
the Board of Parks and Recreation created in Section 79-4-301 in relation to
passenger ropeway systems pursuant to that chapter.
